Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.570

Indemnification of officers, employees, and agents.

Unless a corporation's articles of incorporation provide otherwise:

(1) An officer of the corporation who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under RCW 23B.08.520, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under RCW 23B.08.540, in each case to the same extent as a director;

(2) The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under RCW 23B.08.510 through 23B.08.560 to an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation who is not a director to the same extent as to a director; and

(3) A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, or agent who is not a director to the extent, consistent with law, that may be provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

[ 1989 c 165 s 112.]